Utah statutes.
41-12a-201.   Administration of laws under Title 41, Chapter 12a -- Compliance with Administrative Procedures Act.

(1)  The department shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and may adopt rules as necessary for its administration.

(2)  The department shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.

